California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The Director of Finance may enter into an agreement prior to September 1, 1976, with the State Race Track Leasing Commission and the 22nd District Agricultural Association to commit the state to advance to the Architecture Revolving Fund a sum of not to exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000), if needed, for the construction of improvements at Del Mar Race Track as described in work order AFD 410 of the Office of Architecture and Construction. Any such commitment shall be deemed, with respect to the project for which it is made, to constitute a deposit of funds available for expenditure by the Department of General Services for the purposes of Section 14957 of the Government Code. The Director of Finance, to the extent necessary to honor such commitment, shall authorize by executive order the withdrawal of an amount or amounts from the General Fund in the State Treasury not to exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for transfer to the Architecture Revolving Fund. Any amount so transferred shall be used solely for the project for which the commitment was made and shall not exceed the amount necessary for the project, after deducting from the commitment the amount of all funds in the Del Mar Capital Improvement Account. Any sums so transferred shall be repaid to the General Fund, with simple interest at the average rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account for the month in which the transfer is made, from the first moneys placed in the Del Mar Capital Improvement Account (created by lease agreement of January 8, 1969, between the State Race Track Leasing Commission and the Del Mar Thoroughbred Club) not needed for the project for which the commitment was given; provided, that, in any case, such repayment in full with interest as specified shall be made from funds in such improvement account prior to October 1, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

4158.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an officer, employee, operator, lessee, or licensee of the 22nd District Agricultural Association, as defined in Section 3873, shall not contract for, authorize, or allow the sale of any firearm, ammunition, or firearm precursor part on the property or in the buildings that comprise the Del Mar Fairgrounds in the County of San Diego, the City of Del Mar, the City of San Diego, or any successor or additional property owned, leased, or otherwise occupied or operated by the district.

(b) For purposes of this
 section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Ammunition” means the
 term as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16150 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Firearm” means the term as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(3) “Firearm precursor part” means the term as defined in Section 16531 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section does not apply to a gun buyback event held by a law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   (AB 311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. 25th District Agricultural Association [4161. - 4163.]

4161.

(a) The 25th District Agricultural Association may enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code with the City of Napa for the purpose of establishing and operating a Napa Center for Wine, Food, and the Arts facility. In addition to those powers specifically authorized to be exercised by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the joint powers agency may accept the donation of, acquire, own, or lease, real property, and may plan, finance by the sale of revenue bonds, construct, equip, and furnish the facility, and parking facilities, and any betterments, improvements, and facilities related thereto, including a bridge to provide access to the facility across the Napa River. The joint powers agency may make and enter into contracts and employ agents and employees. The joint powers agency may manage, maintain, and operate the facility, or may enter into management contracts for the operation of the facility.

(b) The state is not liable for any debt incurred by the joint powers agency in the event of any default on revenue bonds issued by the agency. This disclaimer shall be deemed a provision of the joint powers agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4162.

The 25th District Agricultural Association may accept the donation of any real property suitable for the location of the Napa Center of Wine, Food, and the Arts facility, and may lease the property to the joint powers agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4163.

(a) With the consent of the secretary, a nonprofit organization may hold an annual fair in lieu of the annual fair held by the 25th District Agricultural Association.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may enter into contracts with the nonprofit organization referred to in subdivision (a) for the receipt of public funds.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services, with the consent of, and on terms approved by the secretary, may lease certain premises commonly known as the Napa Valley Expo, containing approximately 37 acres situated in the County and City of Napa, to the nonprofit organization referred to in subdivision (a) for a period not to exceed 99 years, to hold an annual fair pursuant to subdivision (a). While the lease is in effect, the nonprofit organization shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the state for the limited purpose of carrying out the authority granted the 25th District Agricultural Association by Sections 4161 and 4162. While the lease is in effect, the 25th District Agricultural Association shall be inactive, and shall not have any powers or duties.

(d) The lease executed pursuant to this section may be for less than the market value of the property, and shall include a provision that the lease may be canceled if the lessee or its successors or assignees does any of the following:

(1) Fails to hold an annual fair.

(2) Fails to make a seat on its board of directors available to the Mayor of Napa and the Chairperson of the Napa County Board of Supervisors for the duration of the lease.

(3) Fails, in any calendar year, to hold at least two meetings of its board of directors, open to the public, in the City of Napa.

(e) Prior to the commencement of the term of the lease, the lessee and the Department of Food and Agriculture shall ensure that every employee in the civil service of the 25th District Agricultural Association is provided with the option of continuing his or her employment with the state, or of accepting a position as an employee of the lessee.

(1) With respect to an employee who chooses to continue his or her employment with the state, the employee shall continue to be subject to all of the provisions governing civil service employees, and additionally, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The lessee shall contract with the department for the services of the employee, consistent with his or her civil service classification and status.

(B) The employee has the right to continue to provide services to the lessee pursuant to that contract during the time the employee continues in the civil service classification he or she held at the time of the employee’s election.

(2) With respect to an employee who chooses to leave his or her employment with the state and become an employee of the lessee, those employees are not employees of the state, and are not subject to the requirements of Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) and Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 3525) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(3) If a position filled by a civil service employee pursuant to contract with the department becomes vacant, the lessee may fill the position with a non-civil-service employee.

(f) The State of California is not liable for any debts, liabilities, settlements, liens, or any other obligations incurred by or imposed upon the nonprofit organization referred to in subdivision (a). The lease executed pursuant to this section shall expressly provide that the General Fund and the Fair and Exposition Fund shall be held harmless from all debts, liabilities, settlements, judgments, or liens incurred by the nonprofit organization, and that neither the state nor any agency or division thereof shall be liable for any contract, tort, action or inaction, error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts taken by the nonprofit organization, or any of its employees, agents, servants, invitees, guests, or anyone acting in concert with, or on the behalf of, the nonprofit organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   Effective August 4, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. 48th District Agricultural Association [4165. - 4165.]

4165.

Notwithstanding any other law, the directors of the 48th District Agricultural Association may not serve concurrently on another fair board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 65.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.8. 50th District Agricultural Association [4171. - 4171.]

4171.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 50th District Agricultural Association, with the consent of the secretary, may enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of creating a joint powers agency to operate, maintain, and improve the facilities and functions of the 50th District Agricultural Association. This joint powers agency’s duties shall include planning, designing, and constructing real property improvements, including new construction, alteration, extension, betterment, and repair, and purchasing fixed and movable equipment related to the facilities and functions of the 50th District Agricultural Association.

(b) The joint powers agency may accept the donation of, acquire, own, sell, or lease real property, and may pledge its property or revenue for the sale of bonds to construct, equip, and furnish the facilities, parking facilities, and any betterments, improvements, and facilities related thereto.

(c) The joint powers agency may make and enter into contracts and employ agents and employees. The joint powers agency may manage, maintain, and operate the facilities, or may enter into management contracts for the operation of the facilities. The planning, designing, and constructing of these improvements, and the agency’s other duties, as specified in this section, shall be undertaken in accordance only with those restrictions applicable to the joint powers agency.

(d) Prior to the commencement of the joint powers agreement, the parties to the agreement and the department
 shall ensure that every employee in the civil service of the 50th District Agricultural Association is provided with the option of continuing his or her employment with the state, or of accepting a position as an employee of the joint powers agency.

(1) With respect to an employee who chooses to continue his or her employment with the state, the employee shall continue to be subject to all of the provisions governing civil service employees, and, additionally, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The joint powers agency shall contract with the department or the 50th District Agricultural Association for the services of the employee, consistent with his or her civil service classification and status.

(B) The employee has the right to continue to provide services to the joint powers agency pursuant to that contract
 during the time the employee continues in the civil service classification he or she held at the time of the employee’s election.

(2) With respect to an employee who chooses to leave his or her employment with the state and become an employee of the joint powers agency, those employees are not employees of the state, and are not subject to the requirements of Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) and Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 3525) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(3) If a position filled by a civil service employee pursuant to contract with the department becomes vacant, the joint powers agency may fill the position with a non-civil-service employee.

(e) If the joint powers agency contracts with another entity for the operation or management of the facilities, the requirements of
 subdivision (d) shall apply to the new entity prior to commencement of any agreement.

(f) The State of California is not liable for any debts, liabilities, settlements, liens, or any other obligations incurred by or imposed upon the joint powers agency. The joint powers agreement executed pursuant to this section shall expressly provide that the General Fund and the Fair and Exposition Fund shall be held harmless from all debts, liabilities, settlements, judgments, or liens incurred by the joint powers agency, and that neither the state nor any agency or division thereof shall be liable for any contract, tort, action or inaction, error in judgment, mistake, or other act taken by the joint powers agency, or any of its employees, agents, servants, invitees, guests, or anyone acting in concert with, or on the behalf of, the joint powers agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.   (AB 222)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. 51st District Agricultural Association [4182. - 4182.]

4182.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the 51st District Agricultural Association may enter into leases or joint operational agreements with any public agency with respect to the use of land and facilities for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Associations Representing More Than One County [4191. - 4192.]

4191.

A city may not impose any tax, except a sales or use tax, on any association that represents more than one county and owns land in each of the counties it represents. A city may not, without the consent of the board of such an association, impose any tax, except a sales or use tax, on any of the concessionaires or rental contractors of the association as to events which take place on the property of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4192.

The city and the association shall enter into an agreement for the provision of police and fire protection services to the association.

This contract shall require the payment by the association of the reasonable direct actual cost of police or fire protection services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. 54th District Agricultural Association [4195. - 4195.]

4195.

The fair site of the 54th District Agricultural Association shall be the property near the City of Blythe known as the Blythe Community Fair Grounds. The association shall not accept any donation or gift of land or other property which is not free and clear of all debts and encumbrances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 693.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. 52nd District Agricultural Association and the California Exposition and State Fair [4200. - 4202.]

4200.

The Legislature finds and declares that the 52nd District Agricultural Association has contributed over three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) towards the construction and development of a horse show arena located on the site of the California Exposition and State Fair. The Legislature further finds and declares that, since the transfer from the former fair site of the 52nd District Agricultural Association located in Galt, the association has not had a permanent fair site of its own and that it is in the public interest that the association continue to carry out its activities at the site of the California Exposition and State Fair and that the association and the California Exposition and State Fair maintain a harmonious relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   Effective August 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the 52nd District Agricultural Association shall have the right to use each year, during its annual spring fair and fall horse show, the horse show arena and other related facilities of the California Exposition and State Fair, or an alternative mutually acceptable to both parties. The association shall adhere to the standard fee policy of the California Exposition and State Fair for all events. In order to provide incentive for maximum efficiency and cooperation, all subordinate contracts occurring as a result of the association’s use of facilities as provided herein shall be based first on equal recovery of costs by both parties, and thereafter all annualized net operating revenues shall be divided equally, with the exceptions of concessions, souvenirs, novelties, and parking which shall remain at the sole discretion of the California Exposition and State Fair. The California Exposition and State Fair shall provide approximately 1,000 square feet of permanent office space at no cost to the association. Adequate notice shall be given to the California Exposition and State Fair of any use proposed by the association. During all association events, the association shall compensate the California Exposition and State Fair for the services, utilities, and equipment used during its events pursuant to the State Administrative Manual.

(b) During the period of use of the facilities of the California Exposition and State Fair by the association, all capital improvement entitlements accruing to the association shall be expended on the facilities of the California Exposition and State Fair in accordance with the Capital Improvements and Maintenance Master Plan of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   Effective August 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

In the event of a dispute between the 52nd District Agricultural Association and the California Exposition and State Fair, the department shall represent the interests of the association. If mediation of any matter fails to reach a consensus, the Department of General Services shall arbitrate all matters based on the best economic interests of the state and the decision of the department in the matter shall be final. Reasonable notice shall be given by the department to all parties to a disputed matter and an opportunity to present evidence shall be provided to all parties. Arbitration costs shall be shared equally between the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 66.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. War Memorials [4251. - 4253.]

4251.

Any association and any county may jointly construct a building to constitute a war memorial. The war memorial may be used for any purpose for which real property of an association may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4252.

The war memorial may be constructed and managed under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the board of the association, with the approval of the department, and the board of supervisors of the county. It shall be owned and used jointly by the association and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4253.

Any construction work which is done pursuant to an agreement shall be performed in accordance with, and subject to, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Sale of Tickets on Association Property [4301. - 4301.]

4301.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or engage in the sale, upon any property of an association, of any ticket of admission or any other evidence of the right of entry to a stadium or an arena, pavilion, or other building which is for holding sports arena events, athletic contests, contests of skill, exhibition spectacles, and other public meetings, places of amusement, or entertainment, contests or performances at any premium or price which is in excess of such maximum price that is printed or indorsed upon it, plus lawful taxes, unless he has first procured a written permit which is issued by such association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. State Race Track Leasing Commission [4351. - 4363.]

4351.

There is hereby created the State Race Track Leasing Commission which shall be composed of the Director of Food and Agriculture, the Director of Finance, and the Director of General Services and three individuals, appointed by the Governor, who are members of the Board of Directors of the 22nd District Agricultural Association. The Director of Finance shall serve as chairperson of the commission. All meetings of the commission shall be open and public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4352.

The Department of Food and Agriculture shall provide clerical services to the commission. The Department of Food and Agriculture, the Department of General Services, and the California Horse Racing Board shall cooperate with the commission, and, insofar as possible, shall, on request, allow the commission to use their staffs as needed by the commission. However, the sole counsel for the commission shall be the Attorney General, as provided in Section 4357.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 5.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4353.

The State Race Track Leasing Commission may enter into leases or other agreements for the use of the Del Mar Race Track and any other property owned or controlled by the 22nd District Agricultural Association which the commission shall deem necessary to provide horseracing at Del Mar Race Track. Any such lease or agreement shall be on behalf of the 22nd District Agricultural Association, and the district shall continue in control of its property, subject to the conditions and terms of that lease or agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4356.

The California Horse Racing Board shall, at the request of the commission, certify the eligibility of any prospective lessee or user of the property to be licensed to conduct horseracing at the Del Mar Race Track.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 540, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4357.

The Attorney General shall serve as counsel for, and adviser to, the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

4358.

The commission shall follow the same procedures, insofar as appropriate, in leasing, or entering into agreements for the use of, the Del Mar Race Track as the Department of General Services follows in leasing or entering into agreements for other state real property. The commission shall, prior to awarding a lease of, or entering into an agreement for the use of, the Del Mar Race Track, consider all the factors concerning appropriate capital improvement of that racetrack, the financing of the racetrack, additional racing opportunities, and any use of new or additional properties or facilities, including, but not limited to, a grandstand, which factors shall be considered in the award of the lease or entering into the agreement. The commission shall also consult with any affected local governing bodies, prior to awarding the lease or entering into the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 540, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4359.

If the commission makes a determination pursuant to this chapter as to the action it proposes to take in awarding the Del Mar Race Track lease or entering into the agreement, it shall report to the Legislature, setting forth the procedures followed by the commission in reaching its determination and the reasons the proposed award or agreement is in the best interests of the state. The commission shall also make recommendations regarding any additional legislation which it deems necessary. However, no legislative action is required to make effective and operative any lease awarded, or agreement entered into, by the commission. The commission shall also make a similar report to the Legislature upon the master plan when that plan is completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 540, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4360.

After the award of a lease or entering into an agreement for the use of the Del Mar Race Track, the commission shall meet from time to time to review the operation of the lease or agreement, and the master plan, and any other related matters. It shall also make such recommendations as it deems proper to the Legislature, other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the 22nd District Agricultural Association, and to the lessee or user of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 540, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

4361.

The commission is a “department” for the purposes of hearings pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

4362.

The commission may enter into a joint powers agreement with the 22nd District Agricultural Association pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. For the purposes of Section 6502 of the Government Code, the common powers to be exercised by the entity created pursuant to the joint powers agreement shall be the powers of a district agricultural association. The commission may contract with the joint exercise of powers entity pursuant to law and may pledge any and all revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind, pursuant to the terms and conditions approved by the commission. The revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind pledged by the commission or its assignees constitute a lien and security interest which immediately attaches to the property so pledged and is effective, binding, and enforceable against the commission, its successors, purchasers of the property so pledged, creditors, and all others asserting rights therein, to the extent set forth, and in accordance with, the terms and conditions of the pledge, irrespective of whether those persons have notice of the pledge and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 604, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4363.

The State of California pledges to, and agrees with, the holders of any bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations for the financing of the improvements described in the master plan pursuant to Section 4156, and which are issued or executed and delivered by the commission, the 22nd District Agricultural Association, or a joint exercise of powers entity created by them, that the state will not alter or change the structure of funding of, and deposits to, the commission or the 22nd District Agricultural Association set forth in Article 9.2 (commencing with Section 19605) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, or the pledge of funds for debt service, security, including any coverage factors, and expenses entered into pursuant to this Part 3 until the bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations are fully paid or discharged or have been fully provided for in accordance with their terms. However, nothing precludes any alteration or change if and when adequate provision has been made by law for the protection from impairment of the contract represented by the bonds, other indebtedness, or obligations, and the right to alter or change is hereby reserved. The commission, the 22nd District Agricultural Association, and a joint exercise of powers entity created by them, are each authorized to include this pledge and undertaking of the state in their bonds, agreements evidencing other indebtedness, and other indebtedness or obligations for the financing of the improvements described in the master plan pursuant to Section 4156.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 604, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. COUNTY AND DISTRICT AGRICULTURAL FAIRS [4401.5. - 4535.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Money [4401.5. - 4403.]

4401.5.

(a) The secretary may expend an amount not to exceed a total of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any fiscal year for any exhibit or exhibits located on any state-supported fair demonstrating, in a creative and innovative manner, the process of production and use of food and fiber from the producer to the consumer in this state.

(b) The secretary may annually provide for a conference of fair judges to aid the department in prescribing regulations adopted pursuant to Section 4501. The secretary may expend up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in any fiscal year for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   (AB 933)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

The department may expend funds appropriated by Section 22 of Chapter 1440 of the Statutes of 1985 in the 1985–86 and 1986–87 fiscal years for capital outlay and deferred and major maintenance projects of a health and safety nature at county fairs, district agricultural association fairs, and citrus fruit fairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 24, Sec. 7.   Effective March 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

(a) A county fair, district agricultural association fair, or citrus fruit fair may expend funds for promotional and public relations purposes of the fair.

(b) The department may expend funds for promotional and public relations purposes for county fairs, district agricultural association fairs, and citrus fruit fairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 24, Sec. 8.   Effective March 21, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Restrictions [4431. - 4444.]

4431.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on or after January 1, 1943, apportionments shall be made only to counties or district agricultural associations which received apportionments on the basis of the premiums which were paid at fairs held by them during the calendar year 1941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4432.

Merced, Madera, Santa Cruz, and Solano Counties may each receive an apportionment although they held no fairs in the calendar year 1941 and the agricultural associations of the agricultural districts which comprise such counties each received an apportionment during the calendar year 1941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4433.

Marin County may receive an apportionment although that county held no fair in the calendar year 1941 and the agricultural association of the agricultural district of which Marin County is a part received an apportionment during the calendar year 1941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4434.

A district agricultural association of a district created subsequent to January 1, 1943, may receive an apportionment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.

A district agricultural association which did not receive an apportionment on the basis of the premiums which were paid at a fair that was held during the calendar year 1941 may receive an apportionment unless a county whose area lies in whole or in part within the boundaries of the agricultural district received an apportionment on the basis of the premiums which were paid at a fair that was held during the calendar year 1941.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4436.

A district agricultural association which did not receive an apportionment on the basis of the premiums which were paid at a fair that was held by it during the calendar year 1941, may receive an apportionment if the board of supervisors of each county which is in whole or in part within the boundaries of the agricultural district in which the association is formed and which received an apportionment on the basis of the premiums which were paid at a fair that was held during the calendar year 1941, by resolution, announces its intention to discontinue permanently the holding of fairs for which the county would be eligible to receive an apportionment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4437.

A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4438.

After the board of supervisors adopts and files the resolution, the county is no longer eligible to receive any apportionment and the district agricultural association which thereby becomes eligible to receive an apportionment shall, for the purpose of determining its maximum base of apportionment, be entitled to receive credit for the fairs which were previously held by the county. They shall be considered as fairs which were held by the association in calculating the maximum apportionment base for the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4439.

Within one year from and after the date the resolution is adopted, the county shall pay to the district agricultural association the unexpended balance of any money which was previously apportioned to the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4440.

No apportionment shall be made for more than one fair in any one year in any county or district. The fair may be operated in one or more seasonal divisions with the approval of the department. The department may approve such method of operation if it finds that savings will accrue from not providing additional facilities or that an increase in revenue will result or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

4441.

A county or district agricultural association may contract with each other or with a county fair association to hold an agricultural fair without loss of any apportionment to which it otherwise is entitled separately. However, no county or district agricultural association may receive an apportionment for a joint or combined fair which is held by them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4442.

No fair for which a separate appropriation is made by the state shall participate in the apportionment of any money appropriated for the encouragement of county and district agricultural association fairs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4443.

If a district agricultural association fair is conducted in any county of the state, no county fair, except a county fair which received apportionments prior to September 9, 1953, shall be paid any apportionment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4444.

No apportionment shall be made to any fair held in Sacramento County after January 1, 1948, other than a fair conducted by the California State Fair and Exposition, the California State Exposition and Fair Executive Committee or by a district agricultural association in Agricultural District 52.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payment [4461. - 4461.]

4461.

Any funds that are appropriated for the encouragement of county, district agricultural association, or combined county and district agricultural association fairs which, pursuant to law, are apportioned by the department shall be paid monthly to the several eligible counties and district agricultural associations in such amounts as the department determines during the fiscal year in which the apportionment is made. The department shall make its determination of monthly amounts based on the relative need of the county or district agricultural association for the funds during the particular month. The monthly apportionment of funds on a need basis shall not result in an annual apportionment to a particular county or district agricultural association in excess of the amount otherwise payable. The aggregate of the monthly apportionments to each of the several counties and district agricultural associations shall not exceed the maximum apportionment for the year.

“Need”, as used in this section, means the combination of the current cash position of the fair and the time of year at which the annual fair is held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1217.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Deposit and Expenditure [4481. - 4483.]

4481.

The county or district agricultural association shall deposit in a bank account or a deposit in a savings and loan association that is approved by the Director of Finance in accordance with Sections 16506 and 16605 of the Government Code any state money which is apportioned to it for the encouragement of the fair which it conducts.

The money which is so deposited may be expended for any of the following:

(a) Premiums.

(b) Capital outlay, including purchase of land, construction improvements, and equipment.

(c) Acquisition, installation, maintenance, and operation of recreational and cultural facilities at fairgrounds of the county or district agricultural association.

(d) Support of county or district agricultural association fairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

4482.

Any expenditure shall be made pursuant to a budget which is submitted to the Department of Food and Agriculture and approved by the Department of Finance pursuant to Sections 13320 to 13324, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

4483.

Any expenditure by a county for construction and improvements is subject to Sections 25450 to 25463, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Department of Food and Agriculture Supervision [4501. - 4513.]

4501.

The department shall prescribe regulations for both of the following:

(a) The judging of exhibits.

(b) The maximum amount of premiums which may be offered and paid for all classes, sections, and types of exhibits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.
